North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-17 References and Trials by Referees [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 53]

28-17-01.
Reference by consent. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-02.
Reference without consent. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-03.
To whom reference ordered. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-04.
Objections to referee — Grounds of. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-05.
Objections heard by court. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-06.
How trial conducted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-07.
Oath of referees. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-08.
Fees of referees. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.

28-17-09.
Fees — By whom paid. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 53.